Washington statutes.
RCW 16.65.280

Licensee's failure to pay vendor, consignor—Duties of director when names of creditors not available.

Where by reason of the absence of records, or other circumstances making it impossible or unreasonable for the director to ascertain the names and addresses of all vendor and consignor creditors, the director, after exerting due diligence and making reasonable inquiry to secure the information from all reasonable and available sources, may make demand on the bond on the basis of information then in his or her possession, and thereafter shall not be liable or responsible for claims or the handling of claims which may subsequently appear or be discovered.

[ 2003 c 326 s 80; 1959 c 107 s 28.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2003 c 326: See RCW 16.57.902.